Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1259.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6135 of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6135. Investigation of circumstances of offense.* * *(c) Confidentiality of parole review materials.--Except as provided under section 6139(a)(5) (relating to parole procedure), RECORDS OF THE BOARD'S PAROLE DECISION-MAKING PROCESS AND records or information furnished to the board by a public official or public employee under subsection (b):(1) Shall be deemed confidential and privileged.(2) Shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery.(3) Shall not be introduced into evidence in a judicial or administrative proceeding.<--12345678910111213141516171819 (4) Shall not be released to the offender.Section 2. Section 6139(a)(5) of Title 61 is amended to read:§ 6139. Parole procedure.(a) Specific requirements.--* * *(5) [Whenever an offender is paroled by the board, or whenever parole is refused by the board, a brief statement of the reasons for the board's action shall be filed of record in the offices of the board and shall be at all reasonable times open to public inspection.] The board shall comply with the following relating to decisions of the board:(i) If an incarcerated person is paroled by the board, the board shall provide a brief statement of the reasons for the board's approval and set conditions and requirements of parole.(ii) If an incarcerated person is denied parole, the board shall provide a brief statement of the reasons for the board's refusal.(iii) If the board denies parole and sets a subsequent review date, the board shall provide to the incarcerated person areas of emphasis that will be considered for purposes of making the board's future paroling decision, including recommended programming , behavior standards and compliance standards.(iv) A board decision shall be recorded and filed in the offices of the board.(v) The decision shall be given to the incarcerated person and at reasonable times be releasable to the public.20260SB1259PN1626 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1259PN1626 - 3 - 12